North Dakota statutes. TITLE 44 Offices and Officers
CHAPTER 44-08 Miscellaneous Provisions
44-08-23.
Removal of political subdivision officer.

Notwithstanding any other provision of law, the governing body of a political subdivision may remove from office any individual the governing body has appointed to any office, board, or commission, for misconduct, malfeasance, crime in office, or neglect of duty or for habitual drunkenness or gross incompetence, after notice and opportunity for a hearing.

Source:

S.L. 2009, ch. 389, § 1.

44-08-24.
Interagency cooperation.

Any appointive or elective agency or office of peace officers, as defined in section 12-63-01, may establish policies and enter agreements with other agencies and offices and a state or local criminal justice agency of this state may establish policies and procedures or enter agreements with other criminal justice agencies of this state to:

Assist other state and local criminal justice agencies; and

Exchange the criminal justice agency’s peace officers with peace officers of another criminal justice agency on a temporary basis.

A criminal justice agency may establish policies for assisting probation and parole officers who are supervising probationers or parolees in the criminal justice agency’s jurisdiction.

When a peace officer provides assistance to another peace officer within the scope of the policies of the peace officer’s employing criminal justice agency, the assistance must be within the line of duty and course of employment of the peace officer rendering the assistance.

When a peace officer acts on behalf of another agency or office within the scope of an exchange agreement entered under subsection 1, the peace officer’s actions are within the peace officer’s line of duty and course of employment to the same extent as if the peace officer had acted on behalf of the peace officer’s employing agency.

This section does not extend or enlarge the duties or authority of any peace officer or any other law enforcement agent except as provided in this section.

Source:

S.L. 2011, ch. 337, § 1.